spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.aff
SFX l   0    sebbek       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    sebbe        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    sebb         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    sből         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    sben         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    sbe          [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    s            [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    nyiül        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiül        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiért       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiért       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyitől       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyitől       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyit         [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyit         [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiről       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiről       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyire        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyire        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyinél       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyinél       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyinek       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyinek       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiig        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiig        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyihez       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyihez       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiből       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiből       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyiben       [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyiben       [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyibe        [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyibe        [^ey]
SFX l   0    nyi          [^n]y
SFX l   0    nyi          [^ey]
SFX l   0    leg          i
SFX l   0    jűül         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűért        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűvé         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűvé         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűvel        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűvel        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűtől        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűről        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűre         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűnél        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűnek        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűként       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűig         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűhez        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűet         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűen         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekül       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekért      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűektől      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekről      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekre       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűeknél      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűeknek      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekké       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekkel      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekig       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekhez      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűeket       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűeken       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekből      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekben      [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűekbe       [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűek         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűből        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűben        [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jűbe         [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    jű           [iuáéíóőúűü]
SFX l   0    iöl          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iéöl         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iéért        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iévü         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iével        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iétel        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iét          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iért         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iérel        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iére         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iénül        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iének        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ién          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iéig         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iéhéz        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iében        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iébel        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iébe         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ié           [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ivü          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ivel         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    itel         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    it           [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    irel         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ire          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    inül         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    inek         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    in           [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ileg         [^i]
SFX l   0    iként        [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ikor         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iig          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ihéz         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    iben         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ibel         [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    ibe          [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    i            [^i]
SFX l   0    i            [^eiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esül         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esért        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    estől        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    essé         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    essel        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esről        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esre         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esnél        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esnek        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esként       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esig         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    eshez        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    eset         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esen         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekül       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekért      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esektől      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekről      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekre       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    eseknél      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    eseknek      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekké       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekkel      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekig       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekhez      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    eseket       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekből      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekben      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esekbe       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esek         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebből      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbért     [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbé       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbtől     [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbről     [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbre      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbnél     [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbnek     [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbként    [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbig      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbhez     [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbet      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebben      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebben      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbel      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekül    [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekért   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbektől   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekről   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekre    [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbeknél   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbeknek   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekig    [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekhez   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbeket    [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekből   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekben   [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbekbe    [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbek      [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebbe       [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esebb        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esből        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esben        [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    esbe         [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    es           [^aeiouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX l   0    elen         tt
